pt-PT: Design do poleiro: Poleiro de canto; Escada; Árvore com vários ramos; Ramo natural; Plataforma; Pedra-pomes/higiene; Corda/espiral; Reto/pino; Baloiço; Outro
ko: 횃대 디자인: 코너형 횃대; 사다리형; 나무형; 천연 가지; 플랫폼; 부석/그루밍; 로프/스파이럴; 일자형/다월; 스윙; 기타
da: Siddepinddesign: Hjørnepind; Stige; Træ med flere grene; Naturlig gren; Platform; Pimpsten/pleje; Reb/spiral; Lige/dyvel; Gynge; Andet
el: Σχεδιασμός κούρνιας: Γωνιακή πέρκα; Σκάλα; Δέντρο με πολλά κλαδιά; Φυσικό υποκατάστημα; Πλατφόρμα; Ελαφρόπετρα/περιποίηση; Σχοινί/σπείρα; Ευθεία/πείρος; Κούνια; Άλλο
sl-SI: Zasnova gredi: Kotni prečk; Lestev; Večvejno drevo; Naravna veja; Podlaketne; Plovec/nega; Vrv/spirala; Ravno/moznik; Swing; Druga
en: Perch design: Corner perch; Ladder; Multi-branch tree; Natural branch; Platform; Pumice/grooming; Rope/spiral; Straight/dowel; Swing; Other
ru: Конструкция жердочки: Угловой насест; Лесенка; Ветвистое дерево; Естественная ветвь; Платформа; Пемза/уход за шерстью; Веревка/спираль; Прямой/цилиндрический; Качели; Другое
hu: A perem kialakítása: Sarokülőke; Létra; Többágú fa; Természetes ág; Platform; Habkő/ápolás; Kötél/spirál; Egyenes/csapos; Hinta; Egyéb
th: การออกแบบคอนเกาะ: ที่เกาะมุมกรง; บันได; แบบต้นไม้หลายกิ่ง; กิ่งไม้ธรรมชาติ; แท่นยึด; หินพัมมิซ/ลับเล็บ; เชือก/เกลียว; แบบตรง/แท่งกลม; ชิงช้า; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 栖木设计: 角落栖木; 梯形; 多分支树; 天然树枝; 平台型; 浮石/梳理; 绳索/螺旋; 直杆/木榫; 秋千型; 其他
cs: Provedení bidýlka: Rohové bidýlko; Žebřík; Větvený strom; Přírodní větev; Platforma; Pemzové/brusné; Lanové/spirálové; Rovné/kolíkové; Houpačka; Jiné
vi: Thiết kế thanh đậu: Cầu đậu góc; Thang; Cây đa nhánh; Cành cây tự nhiên; Bệ đỡ; Đá bọt/Dụng cụ chải chuốt; Dây thừng/xoắn ốc; Thanh thẳng/chốt gỗ; Swing; Khác
sk-SK: Dizajn bidla: Rohové bidielko; Rebrík; Viacvetvový strom; Prírodná vetvička; Plošina; Pemzové/ošetrovacie; Lanové/špirálové; Rovné/kolíkové; Hojdačka; Iné
zh-TW: 棲木設計: 角落棲木; 梯型; 多分支樹; 自然分支; 平台; 浮石/梳理; 繩索/螺旋; 直桿/暗榫; 搖擺樂; 其他
tr: Tünek tasarımı: Köşe tünek; Merdiven; Çok dallı ağaç; Doğal dal; Platform; Pomza/bakım; Halat/spiral; Düz/silindirik; Salıncak tünek; Diğer
fr: Conception du perchoir: Perchoir d’angle; Échelle; Arbre à plusieurs branches; Branche naturelle; Plateforme; Pierre ponce/soin; Corde/spirale; Droit/goujon; Swing; Autre
bg-BG: Тип конструкция на кацалка: Ъглова кацалка; Стълба; Многоклоново дърво; Естествен клон; Платформа; Пемза; Въже/спирала; Прави/дюбел; Люлка; Друго
de: Sitzstangendesign: Eckplatz; Leiter; Vogelbaum; Aus natürlichem Holz; Plattform; Bimsstein/Krallenpflege; Seil/Spirale; Gerade/Stange; Swing; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Dizajn prečke: Kutna prečka; Ljestve; Stablo s više grana; Prirodna grana; Platforma; Plovućac/njegovanje; Uže/spirala; Ravno/štap; Swing; Ostalo
sv: Design av sittpinne: Hörnpinne; Stege; Flergrenat träd; Naturlig gren; Plattform; Pimpsten/grooming; Rep/spiral; Rak/plugg; Swing; Övrigt
it: Design del posatoio: Trespolo d'angolo; A scala; Albero multi-filiale; filiale naturale; Piattaforma; Pomice/toelettatura; Corda/spirale; Dritto/tassello; Swing; Altro
es: Diseño del posadero: Percha de esquina; Escalera; Árbol con varias ramas; Ramas naturales; Plataforma; Piedra pómez/acicalamiento; Cuerda/espiral; Recto/espiga; Swing; Otros
lt-LT: Laktos konstrukcija: Kampinis laktis; Kopėčios; Daugiašakis medis; Natūrali šaka; Su atrama; Pemza/šukavimas; Virvė / spiralė; Tiesus / kaištis; Paslankus; Kita
fi: Orsimuotoilu: Kulmaorsi; Tikkaat; Monioksainen puu; Luonnonoksa; Alusta; Hohkakivi/kynsiviilaus; Köysi/spiraali; Suora/pyöreä; Keinu; Muu
ja: 止まり木のデザイン: コーナーパーチ; ラダー; 多枝ツリー; 自然の枝; プラットフォーム; 軽石/グルーミング; ロープ/スパイラル; ストレート/ダボ; スイング; その他
pt-BR: Design de poleiro: Poleiro angular; Escada; Árvore com múltiplos galhos; Galho natural; Plataforma; Pedra-pomes/cuidados pessoais; Corda em formato espiral; Haste reta; Swing; Outro
pl: Konstrukcja żerdzi: Narożny drążek; Drabinka; Drzewko wielogałęziowe; Naturalna gałąź; Platforma; Pumeks / do pielęgnacji; Lina / spiralny; Prosty / kołek; Huśtawka; Pozostałe
nl: Zitstokontwerp: Hoekzitplaats; Ladder; Boom met meerdere takken; Natuurlijke tak; Platform; Puimsteen/verzorging; Touw/spiraal; Rechte stok (deuvel); Schommel; Overig
nb: Design på vagle: Hjørneplass; Stige; Flergrenstre; Naturlig gren; Plattform; Pimpstein/pleie; Tau/spiral; Rett/dybel; Swing; Annet
ro-RO: Designul prăjinii: Prăjină de colț; Scară; Copac cu mai multe ramuri; Ramură naturală; Platformă; Piatră ponce/îngrijire; Frânghie/spirală; Dreaptă/dreptunghi; Leagăn; Altele